Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2924
Permit for entry or permit, defined.

Permit for entry or permit means a pre-movement authorization for entry into the State of Nebraska obtained from the department which states the conditions under which the animal movement may be made and the location where the animal or animals are going and includes a permit authorization number which is required to be recorded on the certificate of veterinary inspection.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 24.